Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-4405
Certifying entity, defined.

Certifying entity means the Behavior Analyst Certification Board or another equivalent entity approved by the Board of Behavior Analysts which has programs to credential practitioners of applied behavior analysis that have substantially equivalent requirements as the programs offered by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board as determined by the Board of Behavior Analysts.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 5.